Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1462
Warranty part; reimbursement to dealer.

A dealer that replaces a warranty part shall be paid the following by the warrantor that issued the warranty for such warranty part:

(1) The actual wholesale cost paid by the dealer for the warranty part;

(2) A handling charge equal to the lesser amount of:

(a) Thirty percent of the actual wholesale cost paid by the dealer for the warranty part. If a part is sent to the dealer at no cost, the warrantor shall pay to the dealer an amount equal to thirty percent of the wholesale cost of the part; or

(b) Three hundred dollars; and

(3) The freight cost to ship to the warrantor the part that was replaced, if the warrantor requests for such part to be shipped to the warrantor.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 21.
October 1, 2026